California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 supported or served by allocations from the block grant program, including the numbers of youth served, disaggregated by factors including their ages, offense and offense histories, gender, race or ethnicity, and other characteristics, and by the programs, placements, or facilities to which they are referred.

(2) A description of the facilities, programs, placements, services and service providers, supervision, and other responses that will be provided to the target population.

(3) A description of how grant funds will be applied to address each of the following areas of need or development for realigned youth:

(A) Mental health, sex offender treatment, or related behavioral or trauma-based needs.

(B) Support programs or services that promote healthy
 adolescent development.

(C) Family engagement in programs.

(D) Reentry, including planning and linkages to support employment, housing, and continuing education.

(E) Evidence-based, promising, trauma-informed, and culturally responsive practices.

(F) Whether and how the plan will include services or programs for realigned youth that are provided by nongovernmental or community-based providers.

(4) A detailed facility plan indicating which facilities will be used to house or confine realigned youth at varying levels of offense severity and treatment need, and improvements to accommodate long-term commitments.
 This shall include a description of less restrictive programs used by the county, including whether the programs are in a facility regulated by Subchapter 5 (commencing with Section 1300) of Chapter 1 of Division 1 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations. This element of the plan shall also include information on how the facilities will ensure the safety and protection of youth having different ages, genders, special needs, and other relevant characteristics.

(5) A description of how the plan will incentivize or facilitate the retention of realigned youth within the jurisdiction and rehabilitative foundation of the juvenile justice system in lieu of transfers of realigned youth into the adult criminal justice system.

(6) A description of any regional agreements or arrangements to be supported by the block grant allocation
 pursuant to this chapter.

(7) A description of how data will be collected on the youth served and outcomes for youth served by the block grant program, including a description the outcome measures that will be utilized to measure or determine the results of programs and interventions supported by block grant funds.

(8) A description of progress made regarding any elements described in this subdivision and any objectives and outcomes set forth in the plan submitted to the Office of Youth and Community Restoration the previous calendar year.

(9) A summary of expenditures from the prior fiscal year, including, but not limited to, total expenditures, a description of whether the expenditures were or were not consistent with the plan
 described in subdivision (a), and a description of how these expenditures improve outcomes for the realignment target population described in Section 1990. The summary shall be in a format designated by the Office of Youth and Community Restoration.

(e) In order to receive 2022–23 funding pursuant to Section 1991, a plan shall be filed with the Office of Youth and Community Restoration by January 1, 2022. In order to continue receiving funding, the subcommittee shall convene no less frequently than twice per year to consider the plan and shall update the plan annually. The plan shall be submitted to the Office of Youth and Community Restoration by May 1 of each year.

(f) The Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall review the plan to ensure that the plan contains all the elements and follows the planning process described in this section and may
 return the plan to the county for revision as necessary or to complete the required planning process prior to final acceptance of the plan. Any actions of the Office of Youth and Community Restoration pursuant to this section shall have no delay or withholding effect on the allocation of funds to counties pursuant to Section 1991.

(g) The Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall prepare and make available to the public on its internet website a summary and a copy of the annual county plans submitted pursuant to this section and date of the Office of Youth and Community Restoration’s final acceptance of each plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 7, Sec. 2.   (AB 118)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Youth Center and Youth Shelter Bond Act of 1988 [2000. - 2025.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [2000. - 2001.]

2000.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Youth Center and Youth Shelter Bond Act of 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1535, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2001.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Acquiring” means obtaining ownership of an existing facility in fee simple for use as a youth center or youth shelter.

(b) “Altering” or “renovating” means making modifications to an existing facility which are necessary for cost-effective use as a youth center or youth shelter, including restoration, repair, expansion, and all related physical improvements.

(c) “Applicant” means any local agency or nonprofit private agency or organization, and any joint venture of public and nonprofit private agencies or organizations.

(d) “Constructing” means the purchase or building of a new facility, including the costs of land acquisition and architectural and engineering fees.

(e) “Department” means the Department of the Youth Authority.

(f) “Equipment” means tangible personal property having a useful life of more than one year and an acquisition cost of three hundred dollars ($300) or more. 

(g) “Fund” means the 1988 County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Bond Fund, created pursuant to Section 4496.10 of the Penal Code.

(h) “Nonprofit” means an institution or organization which is owned and operated by one or more corporations or associations with no part of the net earnings benefiting any private shareholder or individual.

(i) “Programs” means a variety of services and activities provided in a youth center, including, but not limited to, recreation, health and fitness, delinquency prevention such as antigang programs and how-to resistance to peer group pressures, counseling for such problems as drug and alcohol abuse and suicide, citizenship and leadership development, and youth employment.

(j) “Services” means those services provided in youth shelters, including, but not limited to, food, shelter, counseling, outreach, basic health screening, referral and linkage to other services offered by public and private agencies, and long-term planning for reunification with the family or in a suitable home where family reunification is not possible.

(k) “Youth center” means a facility where children, ages 6 to 17, inclusive, come together for programs and activities.

(l) “Youth shelter” means a facility that provides a variety of services to homeless minors living on the street to assist them with their immediate survival needs and to help reunite them with their parents or, as a last alternative, find a suitable home.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1535, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Youth Center and Youth Shelter Bond Act Program [2010. - 2025.]

2010.

Money in the 1988 County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Bond Fund created pursuant to Section 4496.10 of the Penal Code shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be available, for allocation, upon the request of the Director of the Department of the Youth Authority and for the purposes specified in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1535, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2011.

(a) The department shall, upon appropriation pursuant to Section 2010, make awards to public or private nonprofit agencies or joint ventures, or both, for the purpose of acquiring, renovating, constructing, and purchasing equipment for youth centers or youth shelters. This chapter shall not apply to institutions of a type under the jurisdiction of the department prior to the operative date of this act adding this section.

(b) If a public or private nonprofit agency or joint venture, or both, is granted an award pursuant to subdivision (a) for a youth shelter which will provide services for both runaway youths and abused and neglected children, the department shall credit the allocation of bond proceeds awarded to reflect the proportion of funds to be used by the recipient for services for runaway youths and the proportion of funds to be used for services for abused or neglected children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1130, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

2012.

(a) A recipient of a contract for the acquisition of a facility to be used as a youth center or youth shelter shall assure that the facility will be used for that purpose for at least 10 years from the date of acquisition.

(b) A recipient of a contract for the construction of a facility to be used as a youth center or youth shelter shall assure the department the facility will be used for that purpose for at least 20 years after completion of construction. 

(c) A recipient of a contract for the renovation of an existing facility to be used as a youth center or youth shelter shall assure the department the facility will be used for that purpose for the following periods:

(1) Not less than three years from the date the contract terminates, where the amount of the award does not exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).

(2) If the award exceeds thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), the fixed period of time shall increase one year for each additional ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or part thereof, to a maximum of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).

(3) For awards which exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), the fixed period of time shall not be less than 10 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1535, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2013.

(a) The State of California shall be entitled to recapture a portion of state funds from the recipient of a contract if, within 10 years after acquisition, 20 years after completion of construction, or 3 to 10 years after renovation, as provided in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 2012, either of the following occurs:

(1) The recipient of a contract ceases to be a public or nonprofit agency.

(2) (A) The facility is no longer used for youth center or youth shelter activities.

(B) A
 county shall not be required to repay funds that were initially allocated for shelters for abused and neglected children under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2020, but were expended for shelters for runaway or homeless youth pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2020.

(b) The amount recovered shall be that proportion of the current value of the facility equal to the proportion of state funds contributed to the original cost. The current value of the facility shall be determined by an agreement between the owner of the facility and the State of California, or by an action in the court in the jurisdiction in which the facility is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 493, Sec. 1.   (SB 347)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2014.

A facility altered, acquired, renovated, constructed, or equipped using funds allocated under this chapter may not be used and may not be intended to be used for sectarian instruction or as a place for religious worship.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1535, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2015.

In a youth center or youth shelter facility that is shared with other age groups, funds received under this chapter may support only the following:

(a) That part of the facility used by young people.

(b) A proportionate share of the costs based on the extent of use of the facility by young people.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1535, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2016.

The department prior to issuing a request for proposal shall create an advisory committee to secure from this committee advice on the request for proposal and the criteria for reviewing and evaluating the responses. In no case shall the department issue a request for proposals for youth centers and youth shelters any later than three months after the money is deposited in the fund for the purposes of this chapter. The advisory committee shall consist of representatives, including, but not limited to, of the Office of Criminal Justice Planning, law enforcement, League of California Cities, County Supervisors Association of California, California Collaboration for Youth, California Child, Youth and Family Coalition, California Park and Recreation Society, YWCA, California Association of Probation Officers, California Parent-Teachers’ Association, Girl Scouts of America, two appointees each by the Speaker of the Assembly and Senate Rules Committee representing providers of community youth services including service providers for homeless youth.

The department shall review and evaluate proposals for funding. The proposals shall be consistent with the criteria developed by the department in consultation with its advisory bodies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1535, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2017.

Proposals for both youth centers and youth shelters shall do all of the following:

(1) Document the need for the applicant’s proposal.

(2) Contain a written commitment and a plan for the delivery of programs, including, where appropriate, plans for innovative nontraditional programs designed to meet the needs of the youth of the targeted community.

(3) (A) Contain a match for funding as follows:

(i) Equal to 25 percent of the total amount requested, when the applicant is a public agency or joint venture involving a public agency.

(ii) Equal to 15 percent of the total amount requested, when the applicant is a private nonprofit agency.

(B) The match may be in cash or in kind.

(4) Document the cost effectiveness of the proposal.

(5) Contain a written commitment and plan to develop and implement a process to receive and consider feedback and suggestions from the community served including a separate mechanism for the youth it serves. A board of directors reflecting broad representation of the community will satisfy the requirement for community input.

(6) Document plans to utilize and coordinate with other organizations serving the same youth population, including making available center facilities where possible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 690.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2018.

(a) (1) Funds shall be available in response to requests for proposals. The department shall rank the proposals for funding on a priority consideration based on established greatest need in the most heavily populated areas, the most underserved areas, and the most economically disadvantaged areas, both in urban and rural counties.

(2) After ranking the priorities pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), funds shall be given to applicants in the following order of priority taking into consideration the factors set forth in subdivision (b).

(A) Private nonprofit agencies.

(B) Joint ventures between public and private nonprofit agencies.

(C) Public agencies.

(b) In ranking the proposals, the department shall also consider the following factors:

(1) The number of youths to be served.

(2) The cost effectiveness of the proposal.

(3) The utilization of, and coordination with, other agencies serving youth. 

(4) Experience in program management, particularly in programs serving the needs of youth.

(5) Experience in programs serving youth.

(c) The department shall, to the extent possible given the amount of funds available, attempt to ensure a broad distribution of the funds consistent with the program priorities, in order to meet the needs of youth.

The department shall consider any protest or objection regarding the award of a contract, whether submitted before or after the award, provided that the protest is filed within the time period established in the request for proposals, made pursuant to Section 2016. All protests or objections shall be filed in writing. The protesting party shall be notified in writing of the final decision on the protest, and the notification shall set forth the rationale upon which the decision is based.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1535, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2019.

The funds shall be given to applicants for youth shelters for abused and neglected children without regard to the priorities set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1130, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

2020.

(a) For purposes of administering this chapter and the allocation of bond proceeds, the department shall treat funding for the youth centers and youth shelters as separate programs and shall fund each separately.

(b) (1) Funding for youth shelters shall be awarded as follows:

(A) At least 70 percent to shelters for runaway youths.

(B) A maximum of 30 percent to shelters for abused and neglected children. Funds allocated for shelters for abused and neglected children shall be prioritized among no more than three
 counties of the 1st to 10th class, inclusive, as defined by Section 28020 of the Government Code. The criteria for selection of these counties shall be given to applicants in the following order of priority:

(i) Counties with existing youth shelters, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 4496.04 of the Penal Code, with demonstrated overcrowding problems.

(ii) Counties that have a demonstrated need for additional youth shelter beds and
 that have initiated planning and the permit process for construction of a new shelter.

(2) Any money that has been awarded to shelters for abused or neglected children pursuant to Section 2011, and has not been encumbered by July 1, 1992, shall be reallocated according to a supplemental process to be developed by the department. The department shall establish this reallocation process only when the unspent funds accumulated under this section equals five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more. The department shall accept new applications pursuant to this process from all counties that have demonstrated a need for additional
 youth shelter beds for abused and neglected children, and that have initiated planning for construction of a new shelter.

(c) A county may use any unexpended funds awarded to a shelter for abused and neglected children under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) for the purpose of acquiring, renovating, constructing, or purchasing equipment for a shelter for runaway or homeless youth. The department shall revise any contracts as necessary to implement this subdivision.

(d) In addition to its advisory committee, the department shall seek the cooperation and advice of the Office of Criminal
 Justice Planning and other appropriate agencies in the administration of the youth shelter program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 493, Sec. 2.   (SB 347)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2021.

No grant made pursuant to this chapter shall exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1535, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2022.

The committee, as defined in Section 4496.04 of the Penal Code, shall give priority to the issuance of bonds in order to carry out the actions specified in subdivision (b) of Section 4496.12 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1535, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2023.

The department shall develop a statewide needs assessment which shall be completed and sent to the Legislature by May 3, 1991, with preliminary information provided to the Legislature by April 15, 1990, regarding the need for multipurpose youth centers and youth shelters for runaway youths. The needs assessment shall identify all of the following:

(a) The capability of existing centers and shelters presently to address the needs of California youths.

(b) The nature and extent of youth needs that are presently unmet or unaddressed by existing facilities.

(c) The nature and extent of future need for multipurpose youth centers and youth shelters.

(d) Cost estimates for addressing needs identified in subdivisions (b) and (c).

(e) Other information, issues, and trends relevant to understanding and serving the youths under study.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1130, Sec. 3.5.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

2024.

The department shall administer funds appropriated for youth centers and youth shelters as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 4496.12 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1130, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

2025.

A county that is the recipient of a contract pursuant to this chapter may use funds received under the contract to provide grant awards to private nonprofit entities for the acquisition, renovation, construction, or purchase of equipment for a youth shelter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 493, Sec. 3.   (SB 347)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Governor’s Mentoring Partnership [2100. - 2106.]

2100.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that California’s children are growing up under conditions of great stress that are resulting in devastating effects on their development and well-being. Structural changes in society, including the breakdown in the traditional family and erosion of neighborhood community support networks, have taken a toll on their welfare, self-esteem, and academic achievement. While youth struggle with many difficulties, four risk factors stand out: academic failure, substance abuse, involvement in the criminal justice system, and teen pregnancy. To address these challenges, the State of California recognizes quality mentoring as a critical prevention strategy, not as a panacea for the aforementioned problems, but as a
 cost-effective method of assisting today’s youth to become productive, contributing members of society, and as an important source of data for improving the quality of all relationships between youth and adults. Research finds that without the caring support, counsel, and role modeling of more experienced individuals or exposure to natural support networks, young people are much more vulnerable to the destructive forces of apathy, abuse, and neglect. As we acknowledge the increasing numbers of children who do not have the benefit of positive relationships, there has been an increasing recognition of the value of mentoring, an activity that connects a caring and more experienced person with a young person who is in need of attention and support. As a means of maximizing public resources, mentoring is both efficient and effective, relying on volunteers as the core service providers to create collateral improvements in the lives of youth. The public investment in the prevention strategy of mentoring has
 inspired significant private support at the local level. Mentoring principles may also be used to create mentor-rich environments wherever youth and adults interact on a regular basis, thereby effectively expanding the world of positive adult contacts for youth in their natural environments.

(b) The complexities of supporting mentoring organizations and promoting the formation of positive developmental relationships wherever young people and adults interact requires the coordinated and sustained support of many private and public sector organizations to ensure that their services are available to all young persons who wish to have a mentor. To meet the needs of each young person, mentor services should be available in communities throughout California and mentor-rich environments should be created wherever young people and adults interact on a regular basis. Mentor programs should be culturally and linguistically competent and should embrace
 the rich diversity of the state. It is the intent of the Legislature and the purpose of this chapter to foster a partnership between the public and private sector for the long-term support of quality mentor programs and mentor-rich environments in which young people can interact on a regular basis with an array of caring adults.

(c) Mentoring California’s youth has been carried on by thousands of dedicated volunteers through local mentor organizations and with the very significant contributions of the business community in both time and money. State and local government agencies also operate mentor programs. However, the need far outweighs the current resources. The valuable potential services of many caring adults and older youth continue to go untapped while the waiting list of children in need continues to grow, and distant youth-adult relationships continue to exist where developmental youth-adult relationships could flourish.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 22, Sec. 90.   (AB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Amending action operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 110 of Ch. 22.   Section inoperative July 1, 2013, by provisions from this amendment.)
-------------------------------------------

2104.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “At-risk youth” means an individual under 21 years of age whose environment increases their chance of academic failure, alcohol and other drug use, involvement in the criminal justice system, or teen pregnancy.

(b) “Mentoring” means a relationship over a period of time in which caring and concerned adults and older youth provide support, guidance, and help to younger at-risk persons as they go through life.

(c) “Mentor-rich environments” are environments that create many opportunities for young people to interact
 with an array of caring adults and where youth feel respected, connected, and affirmed.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 22, Sec. 91.   (AB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Amending action operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 110 of Ch. 22.   Section inoperative July 1, 2013, by provisions from this amendment.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.

It is the intent of the Legislature that all youth mentoring programs shall be afforded all of the following:

(a) The adoption of quality assurance standards by school- and community-based mentor programs.

(b) The provision of mentor program technical assistance.

(c) The provision of technical assistance to any organization that wishes to improve youth-adult relationships.

(d) The provision of a mentor program clearinghouse and library service.

(e) The preparation and periodic updating of a statewide directory of mentor program services.

(f) The provision of mentor program referrals to the general public.

(g) The coordination of the state employee mentor recruitment campaign.

(h) The development of a coordinated and coherent reporting form and requirements.

(i) (1) In order to obtain funding appropriated by the Legislature, mentor programs shall have adopted the California Mentor Initiative Quality Assurance Standards and shall provide data regarding mentee outcomes as requested by the state funding agencies consistent with subdivision (h).

(2) Adopted in 1997, the Quality Assurance Standards
 can be found in the State Department of Alcohol and Drug Programs Publication Number 99-1121. The requirements of these standards are summarized as follows:

(A) A statement of purpose and a long-range plan.

(B) A recruitment plan for both mentors and mentees.

(C) An orientation for mentors and mentees.

(D) Eligibility screening for mentors and mentees.

(E) A readiness and training curriculum for all mentors and mentees.

(F) A strategy that matches the provider program’s purpose.

(G) A monitoring program that includes ongoing assessment.

(H) A support, recognition, and retention component, including ongoing peer support, training, and development.

(I) Closure steps that include confidential exit interviews.

(J) An evaluation process based on an outcome analysis of the mentor program, program criteria, and statement of purpose.

(j) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 22, Sec. 92.   (AB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Amending action operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 110 of Ch. 22.   Section inoperative July 1, 2013, by provisions from this amendment.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Office of Youth and Community Restoration [2200. - 2202.]

2200.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2021, there is in the California Health and Human Services Agency the Office of Youth and Community Restoration.

(b) The office’s mission is to promote trauma responsive, culturally informed services for youth involved in the juvenile justice system that support the youths’ successful transition into adulthood and help them become responsible, thriving, and engaged members of their communities.

(c) The office shall have the responsibility and authority to do all of the following:

(1) Once data becomes available as a result of the plan developed to Section 13015 of the Penal Code, develop a report on youth
 outcomes in the juvenile justice system.

(2) Identify policy recommendations for improved outcomes and integrated programs and services to best support delinquent youth.

(3) Identify and disseminate best practices to help inform rehabilitative and restorative youth practices, including education, diversion, re-entry, religious and victims’ services.

(4) Provide technical assistance as requested to develop and expand local youth diversion opportunities to meet the varied needs of the delinquent youth population, including but not limited to sex offender, substance abuse, and mental health treatment.

(5) Report annually on the work of the Office of Youth and Community Restoration.

(6) (A) Develop an annual report on chronic absenteeism rates in juvenile court schools at juvenile facilities. The office may work with the State Department of Education and county offices of education to include data for all juvenile court schools.

(B) Subject to available funding, investigate the reasons for absenteeism at juvenile court schools with chronic absenteeism rates of 15 percent or more, including, but not limited to, an investigation of whether the juvenile facility has provided sufficient staff to support transportation and access to educational services and whether policies or practices have been implemented that withhold educational services from youth as a means of individual or group punishment. The office shall include a summary of the findings of any investigation it conducts in the annual report.

(C) Subject to available
 funding, if, after an investigation, the office determines that insufficient staff, transportation, punitive policies, or any policies under the juvenile facility’s control are contributing to chronic absenteeism rates, provide technical assistance to ameliorate the identified causes of the chronic absenteeism.

(d) The office shall have an ombudsperson, who has the authority to do all of the following:

(1) Investigate complaints from youth.

(2) Decide, in its discretion, whether to investigate complaints from youth who are detained in the, or committed to, juvenile facilities, families, staff, and others about harmful conditions or practices, violations of laws and regulations governing facilities, and circumstances presenting an emergency situation, or refer complaints to another body for investigation.

(3) Publish and provide regular reports to the Legislature about complaints received and subsequent findings and actions taken, pursuant to Section 2200.5.

(4) Have access to, review, and receive and make copies of any record of a local agency, and contractors with local agencies, including, but not limited to, all juvenile facility records, at all times, except personnel records legally required to be kept confidential. Access to records shall be in accordance with existing law and rules of court governing juvenile confidentiality and all other applicable laws.

(5) Meet or communicate privately with any youth, individually or in groups of youth. Meet or communicate privately with any personnel, or volunteer in a
 juvenile facility and premises within the control of a county or local agency, or a contractor with a county or local agency, and interview any relevant witnesses. The ombudsperson may interview sworn probation personnel in accordance with applicable federal and state law, local probation department policies, and collective bargaining agreements. The ombudsperson shall be granted access to youth at all times, and may take notes, audio or video recording, or photographs during the meeting or communication with youth, to the extent not otherwise prohibited by applicable federal or state law. The ombudsperson shall be permitted to carry with them and use the equipment necessary to document the meeting or communication with youth as described in this section, to the extent not otherwise prohibited by applicable federal or state law. This equipment includes, but is not limited to, state-issued computers, audio or video recording devices, cameras, or technology providing the ombudsperson internet
 access. Access shall be in accordance with existing law and rules of court governing juvenile confidentiality and all other applicable laws.

(6) Disseminate information and provide training and technical assistance to youth who are involved in the juvenile justice system, including by providing training to currently incarcerated youth as individuals or in a group, in a private setting. Disseminate information and provide training and technical assistance to social workers, probation officers, tribal child welfare agencies, child welfare organizations, children’s and youth advocacy groups, consumer and service provider organizations, and other interested parties on the rights of youth involved in the juvenile justice system and the services provided by the ombudsperson. The rights shall include rights set forth in
 federal and state law and regulations for youth detained in or committed to juvenile justice facilities. The information shall include methods of contacting the ombudsperson and notification that conversations with the office may be disclosed to other persons, as necessary to adequately investigate and resolve a complaint.

(7) Access, visit, and observe juvenile facilities and premises within the control of a county, or local agency, or a contractor with a county, or local agency, serving youth involved in the juvenile justice system. The ombudsperson shall be granted access to the facilities at any time with or without prior notice.

(8) For purposes of this section, “record” means documents, papers, memoranda, logs, reports, letters, calendars, schedules, notes, files, drawings, grievances or
 complaints, and electronic content, including, but not limited to, videos, photographs, blogs, video blogs, instant and text messages, email, or other items developed or received under law or in connection with the transaction of official business, but does not include material that is protected by privilege.

(9) Ombudsperson staff shall conduct a site visit to every juvenile facility and premises within the control of a county or local agency, or a contractor with a county or local agency, no less frequently than once per year.

(e) The Division of the Ombudsperson of the Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall design posters and provide the posters to each juvenile facility operator subject to Section 224.72. These posters shall include the toll-free telephone number of the Ombudsperson of the Office of Youth and Community Restoration.

(f) Consistent with Chapter 17.5 (commencing with Section 7290) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, on or before July 1, 2023, the Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall ensure the listing of rights and posters described in this section are translated into Spanish and other languages as determined necessary and distribute to each juvenile facility operator.

(g) (1) The Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall evaluate the efficacy of local programs being utilized for realigned youth. No later than July 1, 2025, the office shall report its findings to the Governor and the Legislature.

(2) To meet the need to monitor and evaluate local responses for youth realigned to counties from the Division of Juvenile Justice, the Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall
 collect the data described in this paragraph not less frequently than two times per year. Commencing no later than April 1, 2025, for the reporting period from July 1, 2024, through December 31, 2024, and no later than October 1, 2025, for the reporting period from January 1, 2025, through June 30, 2025, and on this schedule every six months thereafter through October 1, 2029, county probation departments shall provide the office with the data described in this paragraph in a format designated by the office. The office shall publish a report of state and county findings not less frequently than annually. The submissions by county probation departments to the office shall include all of the following, disaggregated by gender, age, and race or ethnicity:

(A) Number of youth and their most serious commitment offense, if known, who are under the county’s supervision who are committed to a secure youth treatment facility, including youth committed
 to secure youth treatment facilities in another county.

(B) Number of individual youth in the county who were adjudicated for an offense pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 707 of this code or Section 290.008 of the Penal Code.

(C) Number of youth, including their commitment offense or offenses, if known, transferred from a secure youth treatment facility to a less restrictive program under the terms and provisions of subdivision (f) of Section 875, disaggregated by program description, as defined by the office.

(D) Number of youth for whom a hearing to transfer jurisdiction to an adult criminal court was held, and the number of youth whose jurisdiction was transferred to adult criminal court.

(3) The reporting and data collection provisions of
 paragraph (2) shall become inoperative on January 1, 2030.

(4) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), for the purposes of paragraph (2), the office may, if it deems it appropriate, implement, interpret, or make specific paragraph (2) by means of written guidelines or similar instructions from the office.
